trunk/apertium-eo-ca/apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix
<pardef n="acarici/ar__vblex">
      
  <e>       <p><l>aríem</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aria</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aríeu</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aries</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>arien</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aria</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>arem</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aré</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>areu</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aràs</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aran</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>arà</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
    
      
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>àrem</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>àreu</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ares</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aren</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>à</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>eu</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>eu</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__agafa"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ïn</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ïn</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ï</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ï</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>àvem</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ava</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>àveu</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aves</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>aven</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ava</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>éssim</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>àrem</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>és</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ara</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>éssiu</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>àreu</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>essis</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ares</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>essin</l>     <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aren</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>és</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ara</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ades</l>      <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ada</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ats</l>       <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>eu</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ï</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>eu</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ïs</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ïn</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ï</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      

<e lm="accentuar">       <i>accentu</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="agraciar">        <i>agraci</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aliar">           <i>ali</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="amnistiar">       <i>amnisti</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="anestesiar">      <i>anestesi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="anunciar">        <i>anunci</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="apropiar">        <i>apropi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="arriar">          <i>arri</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="atalaiar">        <i>atalai</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="auxiliar">        <i>auxili</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aviciar">         <i>avici</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="batiar">          <i>bati</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="calumniar">       <i>calumni</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="canviar de">      <i>canvi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de</l><r><g><b/>de</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="cartografiar">    <i>cartografi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="compendiar">      <i>compendi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="confiar">         <i>confi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/><p><l><b/>en</l><r><g><b/>en</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="conrear">         <i>conre</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contagiar">       <i>contagi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contrariar">      <i>contrari</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="denunciar">       <i>denunci</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desprestigiar">   <i>desprestigi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desvariar">       <i>desvari</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dissociar">       <i>dissoci</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="efectuar">        <i>efectu</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="engabiar">        <i>engabi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enviar">          <i>envi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esbarriar">       <i>esbarri</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esglaiar">        <i>esglai</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="especiar">        <i>especi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="espoliar">        <i>espoli</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="estalviar">       <i>estalvi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="evidenciar">      <i>evidenci</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="exfoliar">        <i>exfoli</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="expiar">          <i>expi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fluctuar">        <i>fluctu</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="graduar">         <i>gradu</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hipertrofiar">    <i>hipertrofi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="influenciar">     <i>influenci</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="injuriar">        <i>injuri</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="intercanviar">    <i>intercanvi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="litografiar">     <i>litografi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mecanografiar">   <i>mecanografi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="miniar">          <i>mini</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="niar">            <i>ni</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="odiar">           <i>odi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="preludiar">       <i>preludi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="presagiar">       <i>presagi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prestigiar">      <i>prestigi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="privilegiar">     <i>privilegi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pronunciar">      <i>pronunci</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="radiografiar">    <i>radiografi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="repatriar">       <i>repatri</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="somiar">          <i>somi</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="traspuar">        <i>traspu</i><par n="acarici/ar__vblex"/></e>
